Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-421.01
Military deployment; permits; stamps; conditions; fee.

(1) Notwithstanding any provision of section 37-407 to the contrary, a Nebraska resident who is deployed out of state with a branch of the United States military or has been so deployed within the last twelve months at the time of application shall be entitled to receive an annual combination fishing, fur-harvesting, and hunting permit, habitat stamp, aquatic habitat stamp, and Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamp on a one-time basis upon returning to the state if the resident:

(a) Submits an application to the commission with a fee of five dollars; and

(b) Provides to the commission evidence of the resident's deployment out of state.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of section 37-447, 37-449, 37-450, 37-451, or 37-457 to the contrary, a Nebraska resident who purchased a big game permit and who was deployed out of state with a branch of the United States military for the entire season of the hunt and who was unable to use the permit shall be entitled to receive a discounted permit on a one-time basis upon returning to the state if the resident provides to the commission evidence of deployment. Alternatively, the member of the military may request a refund of the amount paid for a big game permit and the commission shall pay such amount.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, big game means antelope, deer, elk, mountain sheep, and wild turkeys.

(c) The commission shall establish a fee of five dollars for the discounted permits authorized in this subsection.

(3) The commission may authorize electronic issuance of the discounted permits authorized under this section.

(4) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that set forth the procedures for applying for, and the issuance of, the discounted permits authorized in this section, including what constitutes evidence of deployment to qualify for the permits.

Laws 2005, LB 121, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 8.